Utah statutes.
58-40a-304.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license for an athletic trainer in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(b)  The division may, by rule, extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless the licensee renews it in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

